lexc/noun/enhutalan.lexc
!!!enhu2.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem +Pref+
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter
      
§EOA§ §uue§ §ooez3§ §OEOE1§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oeoez1§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§
§VV§ §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ 

      
LEXICON Root
Noun;
Noun1;
Prefigekoto;

LEXICON Prefigekoto
+Pref+:keresztül   Noun1;
+Pref+:kölcsön   Noun1;
+Pref+:széjjel   Noun1;
+Pref+:szembe   Noun1;
+Pref+:szerte   Noun1;
+Pref+:vissza   Noun1;
+Pref+:helyre   Noun1;
+Pref+:tovább   Noun1;
+Pref+:tönkre   Noun1;
+Pref+:észre   Noun1;
+Pref+:rajta   Noun1;
+Pref+:előre   Noun1;
+Pref+:félbe   Noun1;
+Pref+:félre   Noun1;
+Pref+:felül   Noun1;
+Pref+:fölül   Noun1;
+Pref+:agyon   Noun1;
+Pref+:ellen   Noun1;
+Pref+:körbe   Noun1;
+Pref+:körül   Noun1;
+Pref+:közbe   Noun1;
+Pref+:közre   Noun1;
+Pref+:külön   Noun1;
+Pref+:utána   Noun1;
+Pref+:végbe   Noun1;
+Pref+:végig   Noun1;
+Pref+:hátra   Noun1;
+Pref+:hozzá   Noun1;
+Pref+:egybe   Noun1;
+Pref+:ketté   Noun1;
+Pref+:össze   Noun1;
+Pref+:mellé   Noun1;
+Pref+:által   Noun1;
+Pref+:alul   Noun1;
+Pref+:haza   Noun1;
+Pref+:újra   Noun1;
+Pref+:abba   Noun1;
+Pref+:neki   Noun1;
+Pref+:bele   Noun1;
+Pref+:újjá   Noun1;
+Pref+:benn   Noun1;
+Pref+:fenn   Noun1;
+Pref+:fönn   Noun1;
+Pref+:jóvá   Noun1;
+Pref+:szét   Noun1;
+Pref+:tele   Noun1;
+Pref+:tova   Noun1;
+Pref+:meg   Noun1;
+Pref+:oda   Noun1;
+Pref+:elő   Noun1;
+Pref+:túl   Noun1;
+Pref+:alá   Noun1;
+Pref+:föl   Noun1;
+Pref+:ide   Noun1;
+Pref+:fel   Noun1;
+Pref+:rá   Noun1;
+Pref+:ki   Noun1;
+Pref+:le   Noun1;
+Pref+:el   Noun1;
+Pref+:át   Noun1;
+Pref+:be   Noun1;


!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;

LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
                            Gen;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON Noun1
aggasztatótlanság AddNoun;
akceptálótlanság AddNoun;
aljasulástalanság AddNoun;
ambivalensedőtlenség AddNoun;
anyagozótlanság AddNoun;
asszimilálódótlanság AddNoun;
babrásulástalanság AddNoun;
barcogástalanság AddNoun;
beszédhibásítástalanság AddNoun;
biszexualitástalanság AddNoun;
bodrozódótlanság AddNoun;
bontástalanság AddNoun;
botolástalanság AddNoun;
burjánozástalanság AddNoun;
bátorodástalanság AddNoun;
bóvlizótlanság AddNoun;
bőgetőtlenség AddNoun;
cibálástalanság AddNoun;
cirpelőtlenség AddNoun;
csatornázástalanság AddNoun;
cseppfolyósítótlanság AddNoun;
csikordulótlanság AddNoun;
csitítástalanság AddNoun;
csusszanástalanság AddNoun;
csöndesedéstelenség AddNoun;
cuccolástalanság AddNoun;
darabolástalanság AddNoun;
denaturálódótlanság AddNoun;
diagonálisítótlanság AddNoun;
disszociálástalanság AddNoun;
dolgozottodótlanság AddNoun;
dugulástalanság AddNoun;
démonikusítástalanság AddNoun;
dördülőtlenség AddNoun;
egalitáriusítótlanság AddNoun;
együgyűsítéstelenség AddNoun;
ellenkedőtlenség AddNoun;
előzőlegesítőtlenség AddNoun;
enyészéstelenség AddNoun;
erőtlenítőtlenség AddNoun;
excellenciásítótlanság AddNoun;
fajnemesítéstelenség AddNoun;
farkasfogtársulástalanság AddNoun;
fejezésmódtalanság AddNoun;
fellendüléstelenség AddNoun;
fiataloskodástalanság AddNoun;
fittyedőtlenség AddNoun;
fogazótlanság AddNoun;
folyékonyodástalanság AddNoun;
forrósodástalanság AddNoun;
fugázástalanság AddNoun;
fásulástalanság AddNoun;
férceléstelenség AddNoun;
fúratlanodótlanság AddNoun;
főnévragozástalanság AddNoun;
gazdaságtalanítástalanság AddNoun;
golfütéstelenség AddNoun;
guggolástalanság AddNoun;
gyepesedőtlenség AddNoun;
gyógyhatástalanság AddNoun;
gyűrűsítéstelenség AddNoun;
görkorcsolyázótlanság AddNoun;
hagyótlanság AddNoun;
hallucinálótlanság AddNoun;
hangsúlyozatlanodótlanság AddNoun;
hasonulástalanság AddNoun;
hazakéredzkedőtlenség AddNoun;
hemzsegéstelenség AddNoun;
hibásodótlanság AddNoun;
hitvallástalanság AddNoun;
horpasztástalanság AddNoun;
huszárosítástalanság AddNoun;
hártyásodótlanság AddNoun;
hízókúrázástalanság AddNoun;
hőfejlesztéstelenség AddNoun;
időjárástalanság AddNoun;
illegetőtlenség AddNoun;
indulatosítástalanság AddNoun;
interveniálótlanság AddNoun;
irányítatlanodástalanság AddNoun;
izomrándulástalanság AddNoun;
jellemezéstelenség AddNoun;
jégtelenítőtlenség AddNoun;
kalauzolótlanság AddNoun;
kapcsolattalanítástalanság AddNoun;
kasztlizótlanság AddNoun;
kekkítőtlenség AddNoun;
keresnivalótlanság AddNoun;
kezdődőtlenség AddNoun;
kocogtatástalanság AddNoun;
kompetensítőtlenség AddNoun;
kontrollálótlanság AddNoun;
koreografálástalanság AddNoun;
koszosodótlanság AddNoun;
kujtorgótlanság AddNoun;
kushadótlanság AddNoun;
kártékonyodástalanság AddNoun;
képlékenyítéstelenség AddNoun;
kétkerék-meghajtástalanság AddNoun;
kórosulótlanság AddNoun;
köpesztetéstelenség AddNoun;
következetesedéstelenség AddNoun;
küldéstelenség AddNoun;
lakoltatótlanság AddNoun;
lazítástalanság AddNoun;
lepcseskedéstelenség AddNoun;
lilásítótlanság AddNoun;
lopásbiztosítástalanság AddNoun;
lágyforrasztástalanság AddNoun;
légvonatosítótlanság AddNoun;
löttyentetőtlenség AddNoun;
magtalanítótlanság AddNoun;
maliciózuskodótlanság AddNoun;
maximálástalanság AddNoun;
mentetőtlenség AddNoun;
militárisodástalanság AddNoun;
molyolótlanság AddNoun;
motyorgástalanság AddNoun;
mutogatástalanság AddNoun;
méltányolótlanság AddNoun;
múlástalanság AddNoun;
naposulástalanság AddNoun;
nemzetietlenedőtlenség AddNoun;
nosztalgikuskodótlanság AddNoun;
nyervogótlanság AddNoun;
nyomulótlanság AddNoun;
nyüszögőtlenség AddNoun;
nótázótlanság AddNoun;
okulárisodótlanság AddNoun;
optálótlanság AddNoun;
ottfelejtetéstelenség AddNoun;
pancserkedéstelenség AddNoun;
penészedőtlenség AddNoun;
pirítástalanság AddNoun;
porhadótlanság AddNoun;
provideálástalanság AddNoun;
pártatlanodástalanság AddNoun;
radiálisodástalanság AddNoun;
rekesztetéstelenség AddNoun;
rezegtetőtlenség AddNoun;
rongyoskodótlanság AddNoun;
régiségkereskedőtlenség AddNoun;
salaktalanítótlanság AddNoun;
sikkadástalanság AddNoun;
soványulástalanság AddNoun;
sumákolótlanság AddNoun;
szariságtalanság AddNoun;
szemfelszedőtlenség AddNoun;
szervesülőtlenség AddNoun;
szobátlanság AddNoun;
szusszantástalanság AddNoun;
szégyenüléstelenség AddNoun;
szöktetőtlenség AddNoun;
sítalpazástalanság AddNoun;
tanerősítéstelenség AddNoun;
tekintetőtlenség AddNoun;
testgyakorlástalanság AddNoun;
toldódástalanság AddNoun;
trinomiálisodótlanság AddNoun;
táplálatlanodástalanság AddNoun;
tökéletlenedéstelenség AddNoun;
tüskétlenítőtlenség AddNoun;
utalványozótlanság AddNoun;
vasasulótlanság AddNoun;
vezekeléstelenség AddNoun;
visszásulótlanság AddNoun;
vállasítástalanság AddNoun;
vételizéstelenség AddNoun;
zseniálisodótlanság AddNoun;
zúgatótlanság AddNoun;
áremeléstelenség AddNoun;
életlenítéstelenség AddNoun;
ígéréstelenség AddNoun;
önkitöltősítéstelenség AddNoun;
útkeresztezéstelenség AddNoun;
LEXICON Noun
aberránsodástalanság AddNoun;
agávétlanság AddNoun;
alkartalanság AddNoun;
andrológiátlanság AddNoun;
apókátlanság AddNoun;
audittalanság AddNoun;
banlontalanság AddNoun;
betegtelenség AddNoun;
boglyátlanság AddNoun;
bruttótlanság AddNoun;
béllettelenség AddNoun;
celluxtalanság AddNoun;
ciántalanság AddNoun;
csiklandótlanság AddNoun;
csúcsponttalanság AddNoun;
dehidrobenzoltalanság AddNoun;
diktafontalanság AddNoun;
dozimetriátlanság AddNoun;
dózsétlenség AddNoun;
elektromechanikátlanság AddNoun;
encefalogramtalanság AddNoun;
etántalanság AddNoun;
falevéltelenség AddNoun;
feketelevestelenség AddNoun;
finomfőzeléktelenség AddNoun;
fonetizációtlanság AddNoun;
futurológustalanság AddNoun;
földönkívülitlenség AddNoun;
főágitlanság AddNoun;
gerontológustalanság AddNoun;
gumidefekttelenség AddNoun;
gyógyszerártalanság AddNoun;
gümőtlenség AddNoun;
halottasháztalanság AddNoun;
hatásvadászattalanság AddNoun;
hidrofóbiátlanság AddNoun;
honitlanság AddNoun;
hátulgombolóstalanság AddNoun;
hőtantalanság AddNoun;
imátlanság AddNoun;
ipekakuánátlanság AddNoun;
jelzálogitlanság AddNoun;
júdásfátlanság AddNoun;
kapitányságtalanság AddNoun;
kavernátlanság AddNoun;
kevesediktelenség AddNoun;
kismestertelenség AddNoun;
kokszkályhátlanság AddNoun;
kontaktustalanság AddNoun;
kozmogóniátlanság AddNoun;
kuruckoriságtalanság AddNoun;
kéregtelenség AddNoun;
könyvesháztalanság AddNoun;
külsérelemtelenség AddNoun;
lazsnaktalanság AddNoun;
literálistalanság AddNoun;
légitértelenség AddNoun;
magnóliátlanság AddNoun;
maradéktalanság AddNoun;
menedékjogtalanság AddNoun;
mikroszervezettelenség AddNoun;
monoteizmustalanság AddNoun;
májzsugortalanság AddNoun;
működtelenség AddNoun;
nanorobottalanság AddNoun;
neveléstantalanság AddNoun;
nyomdátlanság AddNoun;
obeliszktelenség AddNoun;
oroszlánfogtalanság AddNoun;
pamutbársonytalanság AddNoun;
patriarchátustalanság AddNoun;
piedesztáltalanság AddNoun;
pneumóniátlanság AddNoun;
pozitúrátlanság AddNoun;
pszichikumtalanság AddNoun;
pátriárkátlanság AddNoun;
rajzvázlattalanság AddNoun;
rengetegtelenség AddNoun;
rokontalanság AddNoun;
rézedénytelenség AddNoun;
sekrestyétlenség AddNoun;
spanglitlanság AddNoun;
sumáktalanság AddNoun;
szedertelenség AddNoun;
szeretettelenség AddNoun;
szivaralakúságtalanság AddNoun;
szukcessziótlanság AddNoun;
szélvihartalanság AddNoun;
szülőföldtelenség AddNoun;
súlytalanság AddNoun;
tartalékostalanság AddNoun;
tengerártalanság AddNoun;
timföldtelenség AddNoun;
trachomátlanság AddNoun;
tutajoslegénytelenség AddNoun;
tórendszertelenség AddNoun;
ugrórúdtalanság AddNoun;
vakondtalanság AddNoun;
verzáltalanság AddNoun;
virágkocsánytalanság AddNoun;
vászonruhátlanság AddNoun;
víztócsátlanság AddNoun;
zsoltároskönyvtelenség AddNoun;
állapottalanság AddNoun;
ázaléktalanság AddNoun;
étolajtalanság AddNoun;
önrésztelenség AddNoun;
újmisésítéstelenség AddNoun;
őrstelenség AddNoun;
